Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.641

Effect of registration and governing law.

A foreign limited partnership that registers to transact business in this state is subject to RCW 23.95.500 relating to the effect of registration and the governing law for registered foreign limited partnerships.

[ 2015 c 176 s 6120; 2009 c 188 s 901.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.